Utah statutes.
70A-2-803.   Warranties.
(1)  A manufacturer who sells or leases assistive technology to a consumer in
this state, either directly or through an authorized dealer or lessor, shall
warrant that the assistive technology shall be free from any condition,
defect, or malfunction which substantially impairs the use, value, or safety
of the assistive technology for a period of one year from the date of original
delivery.
(2)  Nothing in this chapter shall limit the ability of the manufacturer or
any dealer or lessor from providing additional warranties on assistive
technology nor limit or affect any other warranties applicable to assistive
technology, whether implied or expressed.
